apertium-war.war.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ o p q r s t u v w x y z
 !%{A%}:a 
 %>:0  
 %{C1%}:b %{C1%}:c %{C1%}:d %{C1%}:f %{C1%}:g %{C1%}:h %{C1%}:j %{C1%}:k %{C1%}:l %{C1%}:m %{C1%}:n %{C1%}:ñ %{C1%}:p %{C1%}:q %{C1%}:r %{C1%}:s %{C1%}:t %{C1%}:v %{C1%}:w %{C1%}:x %{C1%}:y %{C1%}:z %{C1%}:0
 %{C2%}:b %{C2%}:c %{C2%}:d %{C2%}:f %{C2%}:g %{C2%}:h %{C2%}:j %{C2%}:k %{C2%}:l %{C2%}:m %{C2%}:n %{C2%}:ñ %{C2%}:p %{C2%}:q %{C2%}:r %{C2%}:s %{C2%}:t %{C2%}:v %{C2%}:w %{C2%}:x %{C2%}:y %{C2%}:z %{C2%}:0

 %{V%}:a %{V%}:e %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:u

 %{I%}:0
 ;

Sets

Vowel = A E I O U
        a e i o u ;

Cons = B C D F G H J K L M N Ñ P Q R S T V W X Y Z
       b c d f g h j k l m n ñ p q r s t v w x y z ;

Rules

!"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
!i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Reduplicating Vowel"
%{V%}:Vy <=> _ [ : - Vowel: ]* Vx: ;
         where Vx in Vowel
               Vy in Vowel
        matched ;

"No Consonant Reduplication"
%{C1%}:0 <=> _ %{C2%}: %{V%}: %>: Vowel: ;

"Reduplicating First Consonant"
%{C1%}:Cy <=> _ %{C2%}: %{V%}: %>: Cx: ;
         where Cx in Cons
               Cy in Cons
        matched ;

"Reduplicating Second Consonant"
%{C2%}:Cy <=> %{C1%}: _ %{V%}: %>: Cons: Cx: ;
         where Cx in Cons
               Cy in Cons
        matched ;

"Adding Infix"
%{I%}:Cy <=> _ i n m %>: Cx: ;
        where Cx in Cons 
              Cy in Cons
        matched ;

"Remove Second Consonant"
Cx:0 <=> %{I%}: i n m %>: _ ;
        where Cx in Cons ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
